Nebraska, session 109, LB919.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB919 LB919
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 23-1517.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
23-1517.01 (1) The recording of all instruments by the roll form of
microfilm or other accessible durable medium may be substituted for the
method of recording instruments in books, and the filing of all documents
by the roll form of microfilm or other accessible durable medium may be
substituted for the method of filing original documents. If this method
of recording instruments on microfilm or filing documents on microfilm is
used, the original instruments so recorded and the original documents so
filed need not be retained after the microfilm or other accessible
durable medium has been verified for accuracy and quality, and a security
copy shall on silver negative microfilm in roll form must be maintained
and filed off premises under safe conditions to insure the protection of
the records and shall meet the microfilm standards as prescribed by the
State Records Administrator as provided in sections 84-1201 to 84-1220.
The fee books shall provide the proper index information as to the
microfilm roll and numerical sequence of all such recorded instruments
and of all such filed documents. The internal reference copies or work
copies of the instruments recorded on microfilm and of documents filed on
microfilm may be in any photographic form to provide the necessary
information as may be determined by the official in charge.
(2) For purposes of this section, a medium is accessible if it is
able to be retrieved through intellectual, digital, or physical means
within institutional or legal parameters.
Sec. 2. Section 23-1527, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-1527 A certified copy of a petition, with schedules omitted,
commencing a proceeding under the laws of the United States relating to
bankruptcy or a certified copy of the decree of adjudication or a
certified copy of an order approving the bond of the trustee appointed in
such proceedings shall be filed, indexed, and recorded in the office of
-2-

LB919 LB919
2026 2026
the register of deeds of the county in which is located real property in
which the bankrupt has an interest in the same manner as federal liens
are filed, indexed, and recorded pursuant to the Uniform Federal Lien
Registration Act. The filing fee for such recording shall be the same as
the fee for filing and recording as set forth in section 9-525, Uniform
Commercial Code. The register of deeds shall file the notices in a file
kept for such purpose and designated Notice of Bankruptcy Proceedings,
except that in offices filing by the roll form of microfilm or other
accessible durable medium pursuant to section 23-1517.01, the original
notices need not be retained.
Sec. 3. Section 77-3903, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3903 (1)(a) A notice of lien provided for in the Uniform State
Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act upon real property shall be
presented in the office of the Secretary of State. Such notice of lien
shall be transmitted by the Secretary of State to and filed in the office
of the register of deeds by the register of deeds of the county or
counties in which the real property subject to the lien is situated as
designated in the notice of lien. The register of deeds shall enter the
notice in the alphabetical state tax lien index, showing on one line the
name and residence of the person liable named in such notice, the last
four digits of the social security number or the federal tax
identification number of such person, the Tax Commissioner's or
Commissioner of Labor's serial number of such notice, the date and hour
of filing, and the amount due. Such presentments to the Secretary of
State may be made by direct input to the Secretary of State's database or
by other electronic means. All such notices of lien shall be retained in
numerical order in a file designated state tax lien notices, except that
in offices filing by the roll form of microfilm or other accessible
durable medium pursuant to section 23-1517.01, the original notices need
not be retained. A lien subject to this subsection shall be effective
-3-

LB919 LB919
2026 2026
upon real property when filed by the register of deeds as provided in
this subsection.
(b) A notice of lien provided for in the Uniform State Tax Lien
Registration and Enforcement Act upon personal property shall be filed in
the office of the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall enter
the notice in the state's central tax lien index, showing on one line the
name and residence of the person liable named in such notice, the last
four digits of the social security number or the federal tax
identification number of such person, the Tax Commissioner's or
Commissioner of Labor's serial number of such notice, the date and hour
of filing, and the amount due. Such filings with the Secretary of State
may be filed by direct input to the Secretary of State's database or by
other electronic means. All such notices of lien shall be retained in
numerical order in a file designated state tax lien notices.
(2) The uniform fee, payable to the Secretary of State, for
presenting for filing, releasing, continuing, or subordinating or for
filing, releasing, continuing, or subordinating each tax lien pursuant to
the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act shall be two
times the fee required for recording instruments with the register of
deeds as provided in section 33-109. There shall be no fee for the filing
of a termination statement. The uniform fee for each county more than one
designated pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of this section shall be the
fee required for recording instruments with the register of deeds as
provided in section 33-109. The Secretary of State shall remit each fee
received pursuant to this subsection to the State Treasurer for credit to
the Secretary of State Cash Fund, except that of the fees received
pursuant to this subsection, the Secretary of State shall remit the fee
required for recording instruments with the register of deeds as provided
in section 33-109 to the register of deeds of a county for each
designation of such county in a filing pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of
this section.
-4-

LB919 LB919
2026 2026
(3) The Secretary of State shall bill the Tax Commissioner or
Commissioner of Labor on a monthly basis for fees for documents presented
to or filed with the Secretary of State. No payment of any fee shall be
required at the time of presenting or filing any such lien document.
Sec. 4. Section 84-1208, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-1208 (1) The administrator may make or cause to be made
preservation duplicates of essential records or may designate as
preservation duplicates existing copies thereof. A preservation duplicate
shall be durable, accurate, complete, and clear and, if made by means of
photography, microphotography, photocopying, film, microfilm, optical
imagery, or similar processes using a durable accessible medium, shall be
prepared in conformity to standards prescribed and approved by the board.
(2) A preservation duplicate made by a photographic, photostatic,
microfilm, microcard, miniature photographic, optical imagery, or similar
process which accurately reproduces or forms a durable accessible medium
for so reproducing the original shall have the same force and effect for
all purposes as the original record, whether the original is in existence
or not. A transcript, exemplification, or certified copy of such
preservation duplicate shall for all purposes be deemed a transcript,
exemplification, or certified copy of the original record.
(3) No copy of an essential record shall be used as a preservation
duplicate unless, under the general laws of the state, the copy has the
same force and effect for all purposes as the original record.
(4) A medium is accessible if it is able to be retrieved through
intellectual, digital, or physical means within institutional or legal
parameters.
Sec. 5. Original sections 23-1517.01, 23-1527, and 84-1208, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 77-3903, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-5-